District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.04a

Modernization of First Source recordkeeping.

Within 120 days of February 24, 2012, the Department of Employment Services shall provide public access on its website to all employment agreements entered into in 2009 through the present and shall make available online all future employment agreements, their status of compliance, and the project or contract’s assigned Contracting Officer or First Source Compliance Officer and their contact information.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-93, § 5a
as added Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-84, § 2(e), 58 DCR 11170